Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1741.05
Handicapped parking citation; violation; penalty.

Any person failing to appear or otherwise comply with the command of a handicapped parking citation for a handicapped parking infraction shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 5.